Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2344
Metropolitan utilities district funds; depositories; bond or securities authorized.

No deposit in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be made in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution designated as a depository unless and until the metropolitan utilities district has received from such depository as security for the prompt repayment by the depository either a corporate surety bond in form and with sureties approved by formal resolution by the governing body of such district or the giving of security as provided in the Public Funds Deposit Security Act. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1933, c. 95, § 2, p. 378;

Laws 1935, c. 6, § 1, p. 69;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2531;

R.S.1943, § 77-2344;

Laws 1959, c. 263, § 19, p. 948;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 56;

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 15;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 76;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 28;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 39;

Laws 2001, LB 177, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 55;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 18.
March 6, 2009
Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.